Missouri, session 2026, SB1425.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 135.155, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 135.155,
to read as follows:
135.155. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of the law
to the contrary, no revenue-producing enterprise other than
headquarters as defined in subsection 10 of section 135.110
shall receive the incentives set forth in sections 135.100
to 135.150 for facilities commencing operations on or after
January 1, 2005. No headquarters shall receive the
incentives set forth in subsections 9 to 14 of section
135.110 for facilities commencing or expanding operations on
or after January 1, [2031] 2041.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 9 of section 135.110 to
the contrary, expansions at headquarters facilities shall
each be considered a separate new business facility and each
be entitled to the credits as set forth in subsections 9 to
14 of section 135.110 if the number of new business facility
employees attributed to each such expansion is at least
twenty-five and the amount of new business facility
investment attributed to each such expansion is at least one
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1425 2
million dollars. In any year in which a new business
facility is not created, the jobs and investment for that
year shall be included in calculating the credits for the
most recent new business facility and not an earlier created
new business facility.
3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, for headquarters, buildings on multiple
noncontiguous real properties shall be considered one
facility if the buildings are located within the same county
or within the same municipality.
✓